Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2612
Reasonable allowance for use, defined.

Reasonable allowance for use means an amount up to a maximum of the amount obtained by multiplying the total amount for which the written lease obligates the consumer by a fraction, the denominator of which is one thousand eight hundred twenty-five and the numerator of which is the number of days that the consumer used the assistive device before first reporting the nonconformity to the manufacturer, assistive device lessor, or assistive device dealer.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 12.